North Carolina, session 2025, HB73.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 16 of Chapter 62 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 62-334. Protection of public utility substations.
Public utilities shall (i) provide security systems at substations to protect against vandalism
and other security threats and (ii) continuously operate the security systems 24 hours a day."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H73-v-1*